Missouri, session 2026, HB1936.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 494.430, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 494.430, to read as follows:
494.430. 1. Upon timely application to the court, the following persons shall be
excused from service as a petit or grand juror:
(1) Any person who has served on a state or federal petit or grand jury within the
preceding two years;
(2) Any nursing mother, upon her request, and with a completed written statement
from her physician to the court certifying she is a nursing mother;
(3) Any person whose absence from his or her regular place of employment would, in
the judgment of the court, tend materially and adversely to affect the public safety, health,
welfare or interest;
(4) Any person upon whom service as a juror would in the judgment of the court
impose an undue or extreme physical or financial hardship;
(5) Any person licensed as a health care provider as such term is defined in section
538.205, but only if such person provides a written statement to the court certifying that he or
she is actually providing health care services to patients, and that the person's service as a
juror would be detrimental to the health of the person's patients;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1936 2
(6) Any employee of a religious institution whose religious obligations or constraints
prohibit their serving on a jury. The certification of the employment and obligation or
constraint may be provided by the employee's religious supervisor;
(7) Any person who is [seventy-five] seventy years of age or older.
2. A judge of the court for which the individual was called to jury service shall make
undue or extreme physical or financial hardship determinations. The authority to make these
determinations is delegable only to court officials or personnel who are authorized by the
laws of this state to function as members of the judiciary.
3. A person asking to be excused based on a finding of undue or extreme physical or
financial hardship must take all actions necessary to have obtained a ruling on that request by
no later than the date on which the individual is scheduled to appear for jury duty.
4. Unless it is apparent to the court that the physical hardship would significantly
impair the person's ability to serve as a juror, for purposes of sections 494.400 to 494.460
undue or extreme physical or financial hardship is limited to circumstances in which an
individual would:
(1) Be required to abandon a person under his or her personal care or supervision due
to the impossibility of obtaining an appropriate substitute caregiver during the period of
participation in the jury pool or on the jury; or
(2) Incur costs that would have a substantial adverse impact on the payment of the
individual's necessary daily living expenses or on those for whom he or she provides the
principal means of support; or
(3) Suffer physical hardship that would result in illness or disease.
5. Undue or extreme physical or financial hardship does not exist solely based on the
fact that a prospective juror will be required to be absent from his or her place of employment.
6. A person asking a judge to grant an excuse based on undue or extreme physical or
financial hardship shall provide the judge with documentation as required by the judge, such
as, but not limited to, federal and state income tax returns, medical statements from licensed
physicians, proof of dependency or guardianship, and similar documents, which the judge
finds to clearly support the request to be excused. Failure to provide satisfactory
documentation shall result in a denial of the request to be excused. Such documents shall be
filed under seal.
7. After two years, a person excused from jury service shall become eligible once
again for qualification as a juror unless the person was excused from service permanently. A
person is excused from jury service permanently only when the deciding judge determines
that the underlying grounds for being excused are of a permanent nature.
✔